Hawaii, session 2025, HB697.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 291L-4, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (c) to read as follows: "(c)  Proof of a violation of section 291C-108 shall be evidenced by information obtained from an automated speed enforcement system authorized pursuant to this chapter. A certificate, sworn to or affirmed by the reviewing [county police department,] entity, or a facsimile thereof, based upon inspection of any clear and unobstructed photographs, microphotographs, video, or other recorded images produced by the system, shall be prima facie evidence of the facts contained therein.  Any photographs, microphotographs, video, or other recorded images shall be available for inspection in any proceeding to adjudicate the liability for that violation. For the purposes of this subsection "reviewing entity" means a county police department or authorized employee of the department of transportation or department of law enforcement." SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $ or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the establishment and implementation of the automated speed enforcement systems program. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of transportation for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.